Ohio, session 136, HB243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.212 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.212. The fifth day of April is designated as "Dolores Huerta and Cesar Chavez Ohio Community Service Day" to honor American labor leader and activist Dolores Huerta, whose work on behalf of migrant farm workers led to the establishment of the united farm workers of America, and Cesar Chavez, who organized migrant American farm workers and, with Huerta, co-founded the national farm workers association in 1962.